Rhode Island statutes. Title 40 Human Services
Chapter 18 Long-Term Home Health Care — Alternative to Placement in Skilled Nursing or Intermediate Care Facility

40-18-1.
Purpose.

The director of the department of human services, in addition to the medical assistance benefits provided in chapter 8 of this title, shall maintain and coordinate a program of long-term home health care. The purpose of the program of long-term home health care is to provide in-hospital eligible patients, who would be discharged to a skilled nursing facility and/or an intermediate-care facility, with a viable alternative to placement in a skilled nursing facility and/or intermediate-care facility. The director shall utilize a federally approved home- and community-based service waiver to provide a viable alternative. The hereinafter listed services shall be an integral part of the viable alternative.

In addition, the director of the department of human services shall utilize any and all other available departmental resources and community resources to enhance and expand the provision of long-term home health care as the viable alternative to placement in a skilled nursing facility and/or an intermediate-care facility. These resources shall be used to strengthen and expand home- and community-based long-term-care services, which will help people stay at home for care when this is an appropriate alternative to nursing facility care.

In furtherance of subsections (a) and (b) above, the department of human services is authorized and directed to seek any waiver(s) required by the United States Department of Health and Human Services in accordance with otherwise applicable requirements of Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act to establish an enhancement of the program for the provision of adult daycare services and home-based services. The department of human services is directed to seek the waiver(s) in order to claim federal financial participation for the services that shall be provided to residents of the state who are deemed to be in need of adult daycare services and/or home-based services and whose incomes are no greater than two hundred fifty percent (250%) of the federal poverty level.

Upon receipt of the waiver approval(s) referred to in subsection (c) above from the United States Department of Health and Human Services, the department of human services shall file with the house and senate finance committees a report of the terms and conditions of these approved waiver(s) together with a detailed plan for the implementation of them within the aggregate general revenue appropriations for adult daycare and home-based services benefits and administrative costs provided for in the enacted budget for state fiscal year 2003; and, provided further, that any reallocations of these general revenue appropriations between or among departments and/or appropriation line items necessary to implement the approved waiver(s), and/or adjustments to federal revenue appropriations consistent with these waiver approval(s), shall be submitted to the general assembly by the governor in the supplemental appropriations act for state fiscal year 2003 in accordance with §

35-3-8

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 451, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 84, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 24, § 2.

40-18-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following words and phrases shall have the following meanings unless the context otherwise requires:

“Adult daycare service” means a comprehensive supervised program on a regularly scheduled basis to adults with disabilities for a substantial part of the day in a single physical location for a specified number of participants daily. The adult daycare center shall be reviewed and approved by the office of healthy aging or other appropriate state agency. Adult daycare services may include, but are not limited to, medical supervision, social and educational activities, snacks and/or hot lunch, and transportation to and from the daycare site. All adult daycare services must meet the conditions set forth in the rules and regulations of the office of healthy aging and must provide these services as an alternative to twenty-four-hour (24) long-term institutional care.

“Case management services” means the coordination of a plan of care and services provided at home to persons with disabilities who are medically eligible for placement in a skilled nursing facility or an intermediate-care facility upon discharge from a hospital. Such programs shall be provided in the person’s home or in the home of a responsible relative or other responsible adult, but not provided in a skilled nursing facility and/or an intermediate-care facility.

“Certified home health” means a home-care services agency that is licensed by the state and is qualified to participate as a home health agency under the provisions of Titles XVII and XIX of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1395x, and shall provide, directly or through contract arrangement, a minimum of the following services, which are of a preventative, therapeutic, rehabilitative health guidance, and/or supportive nature to persons at home: skilled nursing services, physical therapy, occupational therapy, speech therapy, and home health aide services.

“Director” means the director of the department of human services.

“Emergency response system” means a twenty-four-hour (24) per-day monitoring service designed for use by elderly adults in the community. The purpose of that system is to provide contact between the elderly adult in the community and the appropriate emergency response agency.

“Government funds” means funds provided under the provisions of chapter 8 of this title.

“Home-care services” means those services provided by: (i) a Medicare/Medicaid certified and state-licensed home health agency; and (ii) a state-licensed home health aide/homemaker agency.

“Home health aide/homemaker agency” means: (i) Home health aide services, at a minimum, includes assistance with personal hygiene, dressing, feeding, and household tasks essential to the patient’s health; and (ii) Homemaker services, at a minimum, includes light work or household tasks such as cooking, cleaning, shopping, and laundry.

“Hospital” means a hospital as defined in chapter 17 of title 23.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 451, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 542, § 89; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 104; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 104; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, §§ 18, 100.

40-18-3.
Patient assessment and provision of services.

The services defined and delineated in §

40-18-2

shall be provided only to those hospitalized patients who are medically eligible for placement in a skilled nursing facility and/or intermediate-care facility. Provision of long-term home healthcare services paid for by government funds shall be based upon, but not limited to, a comprehensive assessment that shall include, but not be limited to, an evaluation of the medical, social, and environmental needs of each applicant for the services or program. This assessment shall also serve as the basis for the development and provision of an appropriate plan of care for the applicant. In cases in which the applicant is a patient in a hospital, the assessment shall be completed by persons designated by the director, including, but not limited to, the applicant’s physician, the discharge coordinator of the hospital, and a representative of the department of human services.

Continued provision of long-term home healthcare services paid for by government funds shall be based upon a comprehensive assessment of the medical, social, and environmental needs of the recipient of the services. The assessment shall be performed at least every one hundred eighty (180) days by the department of human services.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 451, § 1.

40-18-4.
Payment for long-term home healthcare programs.

When a long-term home healthcare program as defined under this chapter is available, the department of human services, before authorizing care in a nursing home or intermediate-care facility for a person eligible to receive services under this title, shall notify the person, in writing, of the provisions of this chapter.

If a hospitalized person eligible to receive services under the provisions of this title who requires care, treatment, maintenance, nursing, or other services in a nursing home desires to return to his or her own home or the home of a responsible relative or other responsible adult if the necessary services are provided, that person or his or her representative shall so inform the department of human services.

If a home healthcare program as defined under this chapter is provided, the department of human services shall authorize an assessment and if the results of the assessment indicate that the person can receive the appropriate level of care at home, the official shall prepare for that person a plan for the provision of services comparable to those that would be rendered in a nursing home. In developing the plan, the department shall consult with those persons performing the assessment. The services shall be provided by certified home health agencies, home health aide/homemaker agencies, and adult daycare centers.

At the time of the initial assessment, and at the time of each subsequent assessment, the official shall establish a monthly budget in accordance with which he or she shall authorize payment for the services provided under the plan. Total monthly expenditures made under this title for that person shall not exceed a maximum of one hundred percent (100%) of the average of the monthly rates payable for skilled nursing/intermediate-care facility service as provided for in the department of human services.

Principles of reimbursement for skilled nursing/intermediate-care facility services provided eligible receipts of the medical assistance program. If an assessment of the person’s needs demonstrates that he or she requires services the payment for which would exceed the monthly maximum, but it can be reasonably anticipated that total expenditures for required services for that person will not exceed the maximum calculated over a one-year period, the department of human services may authorize payment for those services.

Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, but subject to expenditure limitations of this chapter, the director, subject to the approval of the state director of the budget, may authorize the utilization of medical assistance funds to pay for services provided by specified home healthcare persons in addition to those services included in the medical assistance program under chapter 8 of this title, so long as federal financial participation is available for those services. Expenditures made under this subsection shall be deemed payments for medical assistance for needy persons.

The department shall not make payments pursuant to Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq., for benefits available under Title XVIII, 42 U.S.C. § 1395 et seq., of the act without documentation that Title XVIII claims have been filed and denied.

The department shall not make payment for a person receiving a long-term home healthcare program while payments are being made for that person for inpatient care in a skilled nursing and intermediate-care facility or hospital.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 451, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 26; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 34.